North Dakota statutes. TITLE 55 State Historical Society and State Parks
CHAPTER 55-06 Historical Study of Yellowstone and Missouri River Confluence [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 431, § 2]

55-06-01.
Yellowstone-Missouri Rivers confluence commission. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 375, § 1; 1981, ch. 528, § 20; 1989, ch. 683, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 45; 2001, ch. 488, § 51; 2001, ch. 503, § 48; repealed by 2015, ch. 431, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

55-06-02.
Organization of commission — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 375, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 431, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.